seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="/ती__prn">
      <e>      <p><l>ती</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>तिला</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>तिच<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>तिला</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>तिच्याकडून</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>तिच्यात</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>तिच्या</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>तिच्यात</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>ति<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>

      <e>      <p><l>त्या</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांना</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांच<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांना</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांच्याकडून</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांच्यात</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यां<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ते__prn">
      <e>      <p><l>ते</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्याला</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्याच<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्याला</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्याच्याकडून</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्याच्यात</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्या<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <!-- 
        tyaanni : usne 
        tyaanna : unko
      -->
      <e>      <p><l>ती</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांना</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांच<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांना</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <!-- check त्यांनी for nom/cc/dat later -->
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांनी</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांच्याकडून</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यांच्यात</l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>त्यां<j/></l><r>तो<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
    </pardef>  

    <!-- reflexive -->

    <pardef n="/स्वतः__refl">
      <e>      <p><l>स्वतः</l><r>स्वतः<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>स्वतःला</l><r>स्वतः<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>स्वतःला</l><r>स्वतः<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>स्वतः<j/></l><r>स्वतः<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>स्वतः<j/></l><r>स्वतः<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>स्वतःच<j/></l><r>स्वतः<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/आपण__refl">
      <e>      <p><l>आपण</l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>आपणाला</l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>आपल्याला</l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>आपणाला</l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>आपल्याला</l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <!-- no clitic for aaplya -->
      <e>      <p><l>आपल्या<j/></l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_bound"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>आपल्या<j/></l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_unbound"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>आपल्या<j/></l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_bound_no_clit"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>आपल<j/></l><r>आपण<s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ती">              <i></i><par n="/ती__prn" /></e>
    <e lm="ते">              <i></i><par n="/ते__prn" /></e>
    <e lm="">                 <i></i><par n="/स्वतः__refl" /></e>
    <e lm="">                 <i></i><par n="/आपण__refl" /></e>
